Utah statutes.
10-3-917.   Engineer in a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town.

The governing body of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or a town may by ordinance establish the office of municipal engineer and prescribe the duties and obligations for that office which are consistent with the duties and obligations of the city engineer in cities of the first and second class.  If a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town uses the engineer employed by the county in which the municipality is located, the municipality may, by ordinance prescribe for its municipal engineer either the duties of a municipal engineer or, if different, the duties of the county engineer, or a combination of duties.

